Utah statutes.
10-6-148.   Monthly and quarterly financial reports -- Cities of the third,
fourth, and fifth class.
The city recorder or other delegated person in each city of the third, fourth,
or fifth class shall prepare and present to the governing body monthly summary
financial reports and quarterly detail financial reports, prepared in the
manner prescribed in the Uniform Accounting Manual for Utah Cities.
